District of Columbia statutes.
49-902

General expenses.

There shall be allowed for the general expenses of the militia such sums as may be necessary for the rental and furnishing of offices for headquarters, stationery, postage, printing and issuing orders, advertising orders, providing necessary blanks for the use of the militia, the cost of storing, caring for, and issuing all public property, and such other contingent expenses, not herein specially provided for, as may be estimated and appropriated for; the accounts for which shall be certified to by the officer receiving the service or property charged for, approved by the Commanding General, and paid in the manner provided in § 49-801.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 780, ch. 328, § 55
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 635, ch. 146, § 63
1981 Ed., § 39-702.
1973 Ed., § 39-802.